Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3525
Criminal history record information; review by person in interest; identity; verification.

Any person in interest, who asserts that he or she has reason to believe that criminal history information relating to him or her or the person in whose interest he or she acts is maintained by any system in this state, shall be entitled to review and receive a copy of such information for the purpose of determining its accuracy and completeness by making application to the agency operating such system. The applicant shall provide satisfactory verification of the subject's identity, which shall include name, date, and place of birth, and, when identification is doubtful, a set of fingerprint impressions may be taken upon fingerprint cards or forms commonly used for law enforcement purposes by law enforcement agencies. The review authorized by this section shall be limited to a review of criminal history record information.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 28.